Wisconsin, session 2025, SB293.
do enact as follows:SB293,13Section 1. 20.935 of the statutes is created to read:SB293,1,7420.935 Native prairie and forage plants. (1) Definition. In this section, 5“state agency” means an association, authority, board, department, commission, 6independent agency, institution, office, society, system, or other body in state 7government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.SB293,2,41(2) Initiative. Each state agency, where appropriate, shall give preference to 2using native prairie and forage plants to benefit native bees, butterflies, and other 3pollinators. The department of natural resources shall provide information to a 4state agency when requested to support this initiative.SB293,2,55